Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201648-442
Violations; penalty.

Except as provided in subdivision (2)(b) of section 48-437, any person, firm, or corporation, or any employee thereof, violating any provisions of sections 48-436 to 48-442 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. Each day's failure to comply with any of the provisions of sections 48-436 to 48-442 shall constitute a separate violation.

Laws 1969, c. 390, § 7, p. 1373;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 287;

Laws 2016, LB973, § 2.
July 21, 2016